Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.555

Eminent domain.

A park and recreation service area may exercise the power of eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes in a manner consistent with the power of eminent domain of the county in which the park and recreation service area is located.

[ 1988 c 82 s 8.]